Utah statutes.
63B-7-301.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Bond anticipation note" means a note issued in anticipation of the receipt of the proceeds of the sale of the bonds authorized under Part 2 of this chapter.

(2)  "Flexible note" means a bond anticipation note whose interest is payable at, and on one or more dates before, maturity.

(3) (a)  "Short-term series note" means a bond anticipation note that is one of a series of notes issued pursuant to a financing program under which it is expected that:

(i)  each note will be paid from the proceeds of one or more renewal notes of that series; and

(ii)  the final note or notes of the series will be paid from:

(A)  the proceeds of bonds in anticipation of the receipt of which the note or notes were issued; or

(B)  money of the state on hand and legally available for that purpose.

(b)  "Short-term series note" includes any note issued pursuant to a revolving credit agreement or other similar liquidity facility for the purpose of renewing or paying outstanding short-term series notes on their stated maturity dates when those short-term series notes are not renewed or paid from the proceeds of one or more other renewal notes of the series.

